Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-24,122
Subsequent administration.

If other property of the estate is discovered after an estate has been settled and the personal representative discharged or his appointment terminated, the court upon petition of any interested person and upon notice may appoint the same or a successor personal representative to administer the subsequently discovered estate. If a new appointment is made, unless the court orders otherwise, the provisions of this code apply as appropriate; but no claim previously barred may be asserted in the subsequent administration.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 200, UPC § 3-1008.